Oklahoma, session 2025, SB99.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2357.46, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2357.46. A. Except as otherwise provided by subsection


G of this section, for the time period beginning on or after January


1, 2006, and ending on July 1, 2016 tax years 2006 through 2016 and


tax year 2025 and subsequent tax years, there shall be allowed a


credit against the tax imposed by Section 2355 of this title for


eligible expenditures incurred by a contractor in the construction


of energy efficient residential property of two thousand (2,000)


square feet or less. The amount of the credit shall be based upon


the following:

Req. No. 1095 Page 1


1. For any eligible energy efficient residential property


constructed and certified as forty percent (40%) or more above the


2003 International Energy Conservation Code 2003 and any supplement


in effect at the time of completion, the amount of the credit shall


be equal to the eligible expenses, not to exceed Four Thousand


Dollars ($4,000.00) for the taxpayer who is the contractor; and


2. For any eligible energy efficient residential property


constructed and certified as between twenty percent (20%) and


thirty-nine percent (39%) above the 2003 International Energy


Conservation Code 2003 and any supplement in effect at the time of


completion, the credit shall be equal to the eligible expenditures,


not to exceed Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) for the taxpayer who


is the contractor.


B. As used in this section:


1. “Eligible expenditure” means any:


a. energy efficient heating or cooling system,


b. insulation material or system which is specifically


and primarily designed to reduce the heat gain or loss


of a residential property when installed in or on such


property,


c. exterior windows, including skylights,


d. exterior doors, and


e. any metal roof installed on a residential property,


but only if such roof has appropriate pigmented

Req. No. 1095 Page 2


coatings which are specifically and primarily designed


to reduce the heat gain of such dwelling unit and


which meet Energy Star program requirements;


2. “Contractor” means the taxpayer who constructed the


residential property or manufactured home, or if more than one


taxpayer qualifies as the contractor, the primary contractor; and


3. “Eligible energy efficient residential property” means a


newly constructed residential property or manufactured home property


which is located in the State of Oklahoma this state and


substantially complete after December 31, 2005 completed in the


calendar year corresponding to the tax year in which the credit is


claimed, and which is two thousand (2,000) square feet or less:


a. for the credit provided pursuant to paragraph 1 of


subsection A of this section, which is certified by an


accredited Residential Energy Services Network


Provider using the Home Energy Rating System to have:


(1) a level of annual heating and cooling energy


consumption which is at least forty percent (40%)


below the annual level of heating and cooling


energy consumption of a comparable residential


property constructed in accordance with the


standards of Chapter 4 of the 2003 International


Energy Conservation Code, as such code is in


effect on November 1, 2005,

Req. No. 1095 Page 3


(2) heating and cooling equipment efficiencies which


correspond to the minimum allowed under the


regulations established by the United States


Department of Energy pursuant to the National


Appliance Energy Conservation Act of 1987 and in


effect at the time of construction of the


property, and


(3) building envelope component improvements which


account for at least one-fifth (1/5) of the


reduced annual heating and cooling energy


consumption levels, and


b. for the credit provided pursuant to paragraph 2 of


subsection A of this section, which is certified by an


accredited Residential Energy Services Network


Provider using the Home Energy Rating System to have:


(1) a level of annual heating and cooling energy


consumption which is between twenty percent (20%)


and thirty-nine percent (39%) below the annual


level of heating and cooling energy consumption


of a comparable residential property constructed


in accordance with the standards of Chapter 4 of


the 2003 International Energy Conservation Code,


as such code is in effect on November 1, 2005,



Req. No. 1095 Page 4


(2) heating and cooling equipment efficiencies which


correspond to the minimum allowed under the


regulations established by the United States


Department of Energy pursuant to the National


Appliance Energy Conservation Act of 1987 and in


effect at the time of construction of the


property, and


(3) building envelope component improvements which


account for at least one-third (1/3) of the


reduced annual heating and cooling energy


consumption levels.


C. The credit provided for in subsection A of this section may


only be claimed once for the contractor of any eligible residential


energy efficient property during the taxable year when the property


is substantially complete.


D. If the credit allowed pursuant to this section exceeds the


amount of income taxes due or if there are no state income taxes due


on the income of the taxpayer, the amount of credit allowed but not


used in any taxable year may be carried forward as a credit against


subsequent income tax liability for a period not exceeding four (4)


tax years following the qualified expenditures.


E. For credits earned on or after July 1, 2006, the credits


authorized by this section shall be freely transferable to


subsequent transferees.

Req. No. 1095 Page 5


F. The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall promulgate rules necessary


to implement this act this section.


G. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2010, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable. The provisions of


this subsection shall cease to be operative on July 1, 2012.


Beginning July 1, 2012, the credit authorized by this section may be


claimed for any event, transaction, investment, expenditure or other


act occurring on or after July 1, 2012, according to the provisions


of this section.


H. No credit otherwise authorized by the provisions of this


section may be claimed for any event, transaction, investment,


expenditure or other act occurring on or after July 1, 2016, for


which the credit would otherwise be allowable.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1095 QD 1/19/2025 5:47:20 AM













Req. No. 1095 Page 6